dicts/it_IT/it_IT.aff
SFX B Y 121
SFX B e 0 ere
SFX B ere o ere
SFX B ere i [^i]ere
SFX B ere 0 iere
SFX B re 0 ere
SFX B ere iamo [^i]ere
SFX B ere iamoci [^i]ere
SFX B ere iamolo [^i]ere
SFX B ere iamola [^i]ere
SFX B ere iamoli [^i]ere
SFX B ere iamole [^i]ere
SFX B ere iamone [^i]ere
SFX B ere iamocelo [^i]ere
SFX B ere iamocela [^i]ere
SFX B ere iamoceli [^i]ere
SFX B ere iamocele [^i]ere
SFX B ere iamocene [^i]ere
SFX B ere iamogli [^i]ere
SFX B ere iamoglielo [^i]ere
SFX B ere iamogliela [^i]ere
SFX B ere iamoglieli [^i]ere
SFX B ere iamogliele [^i]ere
SFX B ere iamogliene [^i]ere
SFX B ere amo iere
SFX B ere amoci iere
SFX B ere amolo iere
SFX B ere amola iere
SFX B ere amoli iere
SFX B ere amole iere
SFX B ere amone iere
SFX B ere amocelo iere
SFX B ere amocela iere
SFX B ere amoceli iere
SFX B ere amocele iere
SFX B ere amocene iere
SFX B ere amogli iere
SFX B ere amoglielo iere
SFX B ere amogliela iere
SFX B ere amoglieli iere
SFX B ere amogliele iere
SFX B ere amogliene iere
SFX B re te ere
SFX B re telo ere
SFX B re teli ere
SFX B re tela ere
SFX B re tele ere
SFX B re tene ere
SFX B re tevelo ere
SFX B re teveli ere
SFX B re tevela ere
SFX B re tevele ere
SFX B re tevene ere
SFX B re tecelo ere
SFX B re teceli ere
SFX B re tecela ere
SFX B re tecele ere
SFX B re tecene ere
SFX B re teglielo ere
SFX B re teglieli ere
SFX B re tegliela ere
SFX B re tegliele ere
SFX B re tegliene ere
SFX B re temi ere
SFX B re tegli ere
SFX B re teci ere
SFX B re tevi ere
SFX B ere ono ere
SFX B re vo ere
SFX B re vi ere
SFX B re va ere
SFX B re vamo ere
SFX B re vate ere
SFX B re vano ere
SFX B re i ere
SFX B re tti ere
SFX B re sti ere
SFX B ere é ere
SFX B re tte ere
SFX B re mmo ere
SFX B re ste ere
SFX B e ono ere
SFX B re ttero ere
SFX B e ò ere
SFX B e ai ere
SFX B e à ere
SFX B 0 mo ere
SFX B 0 te ere
SFX B e anno ere
SFX B ere a ere
SFX B ere iate [^i]ere
SFX B ere ate iere
SFX B ere ano ere
SFX B re ssi ere
SFX B re sse ere
SFX B re ssimo ere
SFX B re ssero ere
SFX B 0 i ere
SFX B 0 sti ere
SFX B 0 bbe ere
SFX B 0 mmo ere
SFX B 0 ste ere
SFX B 0 bbero ere
SFX B re nte ere
SFX B re ntesi ere
SFX B re nti ere
SFX B re ntisi ere
SFX B re vasi ere
SFX B e mici ere
SFX B e tici ere
SFX B e cisi ere
SFX B e vici ere
SFX B e tisi ere
SFX B e misi ere
SFX B e glisi ere
SFX B e lesi ere
SFX B e visi ere
SFX B re temene ere
SFX B re temelo ere
SFX B re temela ere
SFX B re temele ere
SFX B re temeli ere

SFX C Y 101
SFX C e 0 ire
SFX C ire o ire
SFX C re 0 ire
SFX C ire e ire
SFX C re amo ire
SFX C re amoci ire
SFX C re amolo ire
SFX C re amola ire
SFX C re amoli ire
SFX C re amole ire
SFX C re amone ire
SFX C re amocelo ire
SFX C re amocela ire
SFX C re amoceli ire
SFX C re amocele ire
SFX C re amocene ire
SFX C re amogli ire
SFX C re amoglielo ire
SFX C re amogliela ire
SFX C re amoglieli ire
SFX C re amogliele ire
SFX C re amogliene ire
SFX C re te ire
SFX C re temelo ire
SFX C re temeli ire
SFX C re temela ire
SFX C re temele ire
SFX C re temene ire
SFX C re teglielo ire
SFX C re teglieli ire
SFX C re tegliela ire
SFX C re tegliele ire
SFX C re tegliene ire
SFX C re tesene ire
SFX C re tecelo ire
SFX C re teceli ire
SFX C re tecela ire
SFX C re tecele ire
SFX C re tecene ire
SFX C re tevelo ire
SFX C re teveli ire
SFX C re tevela ire
SFX C re tevele ire
SFX C re tevene ire
SFX C re temi ire
SFX C re tegli ire
SFX C re teci ire
SFX C re tevi ire
SFX C re tene ire
SFX C ire ono ire
SFX C re vo ire
SFX C re vi ire
SFX C re va ire
SFX C re vamo ire
SFX C re vate ire
SFX C re vano ire
SFX C re i ire
SFX C re sti ire
SFX C ire ì ire
SFX C re mmo ire
SFX C re ste ire
SFX C e ono ire
SFX C e ò ire
SFX C e ai ire
SFX C e à ire
SFX C 0 mo ire
SFX C 0 te ire
SFX C e anno ire
SFX C ire a ire
SFX C re ate ire
SFX C ire ano ire
SFX C re ssi ire
SFX C re sse ire
SFX C re ssimo ire
SFX C re ssero ire
SFX C 0 i ire
SFX C 0 sti ire
SFX C 0 bbe ire
SFX C 0 mmo ire
SFX C 0 ste ire
SFX C 0 bbero ire
SFX C ire ente ire
SFX C ire entesi ire
SFX C ire enti ire
SFX C ire entisi ire
SFX C re vasi ire
SFX C e mici ire
SFX C e misi ire
SFX C e tici ire
SFX C e tisi ire
SFX C e cisi ire
SFX C e glisi ire
SFX C e vici ire
SFX C e visi ire
SFX C e lesi ire
SFX C re amovelo ire
SFX C re amovela ire
SFX C re amoveli ire
SFX C re amovele ire
SFX C re amovene ire
SFX C re amovi ire

SFX D Y 47
SFX D 0 si ando
SFX D 0 mi ando
SFX D 0 ti ando
SFX D 0 ci ando
SFX D 0 vi ando
SFX D 0 li ando
SFX D 0 meli ando
SFX D 0 seli ando
SFX D 0 celi ando
SFX D 0 veli ando
SFX D 0 la ando
SFX D 0 mela ando
SFX D 0 sela ando
SFX D 0 cela ando
SFX D 0 vela ando
SFX D 0 lo ando
SFX D 0 melo ando
SFX D 0 selo ando
SFX D 0 celo ando
SFX D 0 velo ando
SFX D 0 le ando
SFX D 0 mele ando
SFX D 0 sele ando
SFX D 0 cele ando
SFX D 0 vele ando
SFX D 0 gliele ando
SFX D 0 ne ando
SFX D 0 mene ando
SFX D 0 sene ando
SFX D 0 cene ando
SFX D 0 vene ando
SFX D 0 gliene ando
SFX D 0 gli ando
SFX D 0 gliela ando
SFX D 0 glieli ando
SFX D 0 glielo ando
SFX D 0 telo ando
SFX D 0 tela ando
SFX D 0 teli ando
SFX D 0 tele ando
SFX D 0 tene ando
SFX D 0 glisi ando
SFX D 0 lesi ando
SFX D 0 visi ando
SFX D 0 tisi ando
SFX D 0 cisi ando
SFX D ndo si ando

SFX E Y 47
SFX E 0 si endo
SFX E 0 mi endo
SFX E 0 ti endo
SFX E 0 ci endo
SFX E 0 vi endo
SFX E 0 li endo
SFX E 0 meli endo
SFX E 0 seli endo
SFX E 0 celi endo
SFX E 0 veli endo
SFX E 0 la endo
SFX E 0 mela endo
SFX E 0 sela endo
SFX E 0 cela endo
SFX E 0 vela endo
SFX E 0 lo endo
SFX E 0 melo endo
SFX E 0 selo endo
SFX E 0 celo endo
SFX E 0 velo endo
SFX E 0 le endo
SFX E 0 mele endo
SFX E 0 sele endo
SFX E 0 cele endo
SFX E 0 vele endo
SFX E 0 gliele endo
SFX E 0 ne endo
SFX E 0 mene endo
SFX E 0 sene endo
SFX E 0 cene endo
SFX E 0 vene endo
SFX E 0 gliene endo
SFX E 0 gli endo
SFX E 0 gliela endo
SFX E 0 glieli endo
SFX E 0 glielo endo
SFX E 0 telo endo
SFX E 0 tela endo
SFX E 0 teli endo
SFX E 0 tele endo
SFX E 0 tene endo
SFX E 0 glisi endo
SFX E 0 lesi endo
SFX E 0 visi endo
SFX E 0 tisi endo
SFX E 0 cisi endo
SFX E ndo si endo

SFX F Y 50
SFX F o e ato
SFX F o a ato
SFX F o issimo ato
SFX F o issima ato
SFX F o issime ato
SFX F o issimi ato
SFX F 0 mi ato
SFX F 0 ti ato
SFX F 0 si ato
SFX F 0 ci ato
SFX F 0 vi ato
SFX F 0 lo ato
SFX F 0 la ato
SFX F 0 le ato
SFX F 0 li ato
SFX F 0 gli ato
SFX F 0 ne ato
SFX F o ami ato
SFX F o asi ato
SFX F o aci ato
SFX F o avi ato
SFX F o agli ato
SFX F o ane ato
SFX F o alo ato
SFX F o ala ato
SFX F o ale ato
SFX F o ali ato
SFX F o emi ato
SFX F o esi ato
SFX F o eci ato
SFX F o evi ato
SFX F o egli ato
SFX F o ene ato
SFX F o elo ato
SFX F o ela ato
SFX F o ele ato
SFX F o eli ato
SFX F o igli ato
SFX F o ili ato
SFX F o imi ato
SFX F o ici ato
SFX F o ivi ato
SFX F o avene ato
SFX F o ivene ato
SFX F 0 vene ato
SFX F o asela ato
SFX F o esele ato
SFX F 0 selo ato
SFX F o iseli ato
SFX F 0 sene ato

SFX G Y 40
SFX G o e uto
SFX G o i uto
SFX G o a uto
SFX G o issimo uto
SFX G o issima uto
SFX G o issime uto
SFX G o issimi uto
SFX G 0 mi uto
SFX G 0 ti uto
SFX G 0 si uto
SFX G 0 ci uto
SFX G 0 vi uto
SFX G 0 la uto
SFX G 0 le uto
SFX G 0 lo uto
SFX G 0 li uto
SFX G 0 ne uto
SFX G 0 gli uto
SFX G o emi uto
SFX G o esi uto
SFX G o eci uto
SFX G o evi uto
SFX G o egli uto
SFX G o ene uto
SFX G o elo uto
SFX G o ela uto
SFX G o ele uto
SFX G o eli uto
SFX G o ami uto
SFX G o ati uto
SFX G o asi uto
SFX G o aci uto
SFX G o avi uto
SFX G o agli uto
SFX G o ane uto
SFX G o ala uto
SFX G o evene uto
SFX G o avene uto
SFX G o ivene uto
SFX G 0 vene uto
