dicts/it_IT/it_IT.dic
accanire/CTXqr
accappiando/D
accapponato/FTUqrs
acceduto/GTUqrs
accludendo/E
accondiscendere/BTXqr
accreditando/DJ
accucciato/FTUqrs
acuire/CTXqr
addivenuto/GTUqrs
aderendo/E
adire/CTXqr
affatturando/D
affermato/FTUqrs
affievolire/CTXqr
aggobbire/CTXqr
agguantando/DJ
agguerrendo/E
agguerrire/CTXqr
agognato/FTUqrs
allibire/CTXqr
alludere/BTXqr
americanizzando/D
ammagliato/FTUqrs
ammannire/CTXqr
ammonire/CTXqr
ammoscendo/E
ammuffire/CTXqr
annaffiando/D
annichilato/FTUqrs
appartenuto/GTUqrs
appesantire/CTXqr
apponendo/E
appoppando/D
appressato/FTUqrs
approfondire/CTXqr
arguire/CTXqr
arridere/BTXqr
arroccando/D
arroncigliato/FTUqrs
arrostire/CTXqr
artefacendo/E
assaporire/CTXqr
assopire/CTXqr
assumendo/E
assuolando/D
asteggiato/FTUqrs
astenere/BTXqr
attecchire/CTXqr
attenuto/GTUqrs
attutire/CTXqr
autogestendo/E
autoregolato/FTUqrs
autorizzando/D
avvalere/BTX
avveduto/GTYUqrs
avvilire/CTXqr
ballettato/F
ballottando/D
bandire/C
battuto/G
benedicendo/E
bevuto/G
bicomando/D
bidonato/F
blandire/C
brasando/D
bravato/F
caduto/G
calibrando/D
calmato/F
candire/C
catalogando/D
categorizzato/F
cedere/Be
chiarendo/E
circonvenuto/G
civilizzando/D
civilizzato/F
coincidere/B
colpire/C
commettendo/E
compiaciuto/G
compiere/B
compitando/D
complessato/F
compravenduto/G
concorrendo/E
concorrere/B
conferire/C
conosciuto/GeJ
conquistato/F
considerando/D
consistere/B
contendendo/E
contravvenuto/G
contribuire/C
convenuto/G
coprendo/EJ
corporizzato/F
correggere/BJ
cospirando/D
creduto/G
crescere/B
cucire/C
cuocendo/E
debordato/F
decaduto/G
decentrando/D
decrescere/B
decresciuto/G
deidratato/F
demilitarizzando/D
deperendo/E
deregolamentato/F
desistere/B
destinando/D
devoluto/G
diffrangere/B
dimettendo/E
discernere/B
disconosciuto/G
disilludendo/E
disimpegnato/F
disobbedire/C
disormeggiando/D
dissolvere/B
distogliendo/E
divenuto/G
dolere/B
dovuto/GY
eccependo/E
elettrizzato/FTUqrs
emergere/BTXqr
equivocando/D
eseguire/CTXqr
esigendo/E
esimere/BTXqr
estinguere/BTXqr
estrudendo/E
evoluto/GTUqrs
falsato/F
fervere/B
flirtando/D
frapponendo/E
fremuto/G
friggere/B
frullato/FJ
fuggire/C
gioire/C
girando/D
giustapponendo/E
goduto/G
grigliato/F
imbattere/BXT
imbellendo/E
imbevuto/GTUqrs
imbolsire/CTXqr
immelensendo/E
immigrando/D
impelato/FTUqrs
implodendo/E
inadempiuto/GTUqrs
inasinire/CTXqr
incadaverendo/E
incarbonchire/CTXqr
incardinando/D
incartapecorire/CTXqr
incendiato/FTUqrs
incidere/BTXqr
incollerendo/E
inerire/CTX
infanatichendo/E
inflazionando/D
infliggere/BTXqr
influendo/E
influire/CTXqr
inframezzato/FTUqrs
ingiovanendo/E
inseguire/CTXqr
intendere/BTXqr
interdendo/E
interloquire/CTXqr
internando/D
interrato/FTUqrs
intervenuto/GTUqrs
intraprendere/BTXqr
intrattenuto/GTUqrs
intravveduto/GTUqrs
inumidendo/E
invalere/BTXqr
involuto/GTUqrs
languendo/E
laureando/D
lavoricchiato/F
manomettere/B
mantenuto/G
medicalizzato/F
medicando/D
mentire/C
mesciuto/G
mordere/B
narrato/F
nebulizzando/D
nuociuto/G
occludendo/E
offendere/BTXqr
ottonato/FTUqrs
pacificando/D
percorrere/B
perduto/GYJ
permeato/F
perseguire/C
pervertendo/E
pesando/D
piacere/B
posseduto/G
prediligere/B
prefazionato/F
premorire/C
premurando/D
prescindendo/E
prescindere/B
preveduto/G
proceduto/G
promettere/B
prudere/B
putrefacendo/E
quintuplicato/F
racconciando/D
rapprendere/B
rateizzato/F
recapitando/D
receduto/G
redirigendo/E
redirigere/B
restringere/B
retroagire/C
riagganciato/F
riappendere/B
riapplicando/D
riassalendo/E
riavuto/G
ricevere/B
ricevuto/G
riconnettere/B
ridipingendo/E
ridivenuto/G
ridrizzato/F
riesplodere/B
rifischiando/D
rifluire/C
rilucendo/E
rincorato/F
rinfondendo/E
rinfondere/B
rinnegando/D
rinsanire/C
rinvenuto/G
riproducendo/E
riseduto/G
risovvenire/C
rispondere/B
risquadrato/F
ritessuto/G
ritoccando/D
riudendo/E
rivissuto/G
saturato/F
sbarrando/D
sbattere/B
scapicollato/F
scarognendo/E
scartabellando/D
scomparire/C
scongiurato/F
sconosciuto/G
scotolando/D
scuotere/B
seguendo/E
sferzato/F
sfrangiando/D
slegato/F
smentire/C
smidollando/D
soffondendo/E
soggiaciuto/G
sopraggiungere/B
soprecceduto/G
sopredificato/F
sottoesponendo/E
sottomettere/B
sovraccaricando/D
sovvenire/C
sperduto/G
spicconato/F
spolpando/D
spoltrire/C
spremuto/G
sprovvedere/B
srugginendo/E
steccato/F
sternutire/C
stornellando/D
stramortire/C
succedendo/E
succhiellato/F
susseguire/C
sussumere/B
svantaggiando/D
svenuto/G
svilire/C
telecontrollato/F
tenuto/G
tergendo/E
terziarizzando/D
togliere/B
transitato/F
trasfigurire/C
tremando/D
ubbidendo/E
urgere/BTXqr
uscire/CTXqr
vaccinato/FJ
veduto/G
verniciando/DJ
voluto/GYJ
